Missouri, session 2026, SB1047.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1263, to read as
follows:
376.1263. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Advanced stage cancer", cancer that has grown
outside the body part in which it started, or that has
spread from where it started to other parts of the body;
(2) "Cost-sharing requirement", any deductible,
coinsurance, co-payment, or maximum limitation on the
application of such deductible, coinsurance, co-payment, or
similar out-of-pocket expense;
(3) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning as is
ascribed to such term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Health care service", the same meaning as is
ascribed to such term in section 376.1350.
2. This section shall be known and may be cited as
"The Missouri Advanced Stage Cancer Cost Burden Cap".
3. No health benefit plan shall impose any cost-
sharing requirement with respect to coverage for treatment

SB 1047 2
of advanced stage cancer, other than the deductible
applicable to other health care services under the health
benefit plan.
✓